Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.310

Rules, regulations, decisions of previous boards—Effect.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

As of July 1, 1994, all rules, regulations, decisions, and orders of the board of nursing under *chapter 18.88 RCW or the board of practical nursing under *chapter 18.78 RCW continue to be in effect under the **commission, until the **commission acts to modify the rules, regulations, decisions, or orders.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 431.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapters 18.88 and 18.78 RCW were repealed by 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 433, effective July 1, 1994.

**(2) The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.